Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1218.
do enact as follows:AB1218,11Section 1. 609.04 of the statutes is created to read:AB1218,2,32609.04 Preventing surprise medical bills; emergency medical 3services. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB1218,2,44(a) “Emergency medical condition” means all of the following:AB1218,2,851. A medical condition, including a mental health condition or substance use 6disorder condition, manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, 7including severe pain, such that the absence of immediate medical attention could 8reasonably be expected to result in any of the following:AB1218,2,109a. Placing the health of the individual or, with respect to a pregnant woman, 10the health of the woman or her unborn child in serious jeopardy.AB1218,2,1111b. Serious impairment of bodily function.AB1218,2,1212c. Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.AB1218,2,16132. With respect to a pregnant woman who is having contractions, a medical 14condition for which there is inadequate time to safely transfer the pregnant woman 15to another hospital before delivery or for which the transfer may pose a threat to the 16health or safety of the pregnant woman or the unborn child.AB1218,2,1917(b) “Emergency medical services,” with respect to an emergency medical 18condition, has the meaning given for “emergency services” in 42 USC 300gg-111 (a) 19(3) (C).AB1218,3,21(c) “Independent freestanding emergency department” has the meaning given 2in 42 USC 300gg-111 (a) (3) (D).AB1218,3,43(d) “Out-of-network rate” has the meaning given by the commissioner by rule 4or, in the absence of such rule, the meaning given in 42 USC 300gg-111 (a) (3) (K).AB1218,3,85(e) “Preferred provider plan,” notwithstanding s. 609.01 (4), includes only any 6preferred provider plan, as defined in s. 609.01 (4), that has a network of 7participating providers and imposes on enrollees different requirements for using 8providers that are not participating providers.AB1218,3,109(f) “Recognized amount” has the meaning given by the commissioner by rule 10or, in the absence of such rule, the meaning given in 42 USC 300gg-111 (a) (3) (H).AB1218,3,1411(g) “Self-insured governmental plan” means a self-insured health plan of the 12state or a county, city, village, town, or school district that has a network of 13participating providers and imposes on enrollees in the self-insured health plan 14different requirements for using providers that are not participating providers.AB1218,3,1715(h) “Terminated” means the expiration or nonrenewal of a contract. 16“Terminated” does not include a termination of a contract for failure to meet 17applicable quality standards or for fraud.AB1218,3,2218(2) Emergency medical services. A defined network plan, preferred 19provider plan, or self-insured governmental plan that covers any benefits or 20services provided in an emergency department of a hospital or emergency medical 21services provided in an independent freestanding emergency department shall 22cover emergency medical services in accordance with all of the following:AB1218,3,2323(a) The plan may not require a prior authorization determination.AB1218,4,31(b) The plan may not deny coverage on the basis of whether or not the health 2care provider providing the services is a participating provider or participating 3facility.AB1218,4,64(c) If the emergency medical services are provided to an enrollee by a provider 5or in a facility that is not a participating provider or participating facility, the plan 6complies with all of the following:AB1218,4,1071. The emergency medical services are covered without imposing on an 8enrollee a requirement for prior authorization or any coverage limitation that is 9more restrictive than requirements or limitations that apply to emergency medical 10services provided by participating providers or in participating facilities.AB1218,4,14112. Any cost-sharing requirement imposed on an enrollee for the emergency 12medical services is no greater than the requirements that would apply if the 13emergency medical services were provided by a participating provider or in a 14participating facility.AB1218,4,19153. Any cost-sharing amount imposed on an enrollee for the emergency medical 16services is calculated as if the total amount that would have been charged for the 17emergency medical services if provided by a participating provider or in a 18participating facility is equal to the recognized amount for such services, plan or 19coverage, and year.AB1218,4,20204. The plan does all of the following:AB1218,4,2321a. No later than 30 days after the participating provider or participating 22facility transmits to the plan the bill for emergency medical services, sends to the 23provider or facility an initial payment or a notice of denial of payment.AB1218,5,31b. Pays to the participating provider or participating facility a total amount 2that, incorporating any initial payment under subd. 4. a., is equal to the amount by 3which the out-of-network rate exceeds the cost-sharing amount.AB1218,5,845. The plan counts any cost-sharing payment made by the enrollee for the 5emergency medical services toward any in-network deductible or out-of-pocket 6maximum applied by the plan in the same manner as if the cost-sharing payment 7was made for emergency medical services provided by a participating provider or in 8a participating facility.AB1218,5,149(3) Nonparticipating provider in participating facility. For items or 10services other than emergency medical services that are provided to an enrollee of 11a defined network plan, preferred provider plan, or self-insured governmental plan 12by a provider who is not a participating provider but who is providing services at a 13participating facility, the plan shall provide coverage for the item or service in 14accordance with all of the following:AB1218,5,1715(a) The plan may not impose on an enrollee a cost-sharing requirement for the 16item or service that is greater than the cost-sharing requirement that would have 17been imposed if the item or service was provided by a participating provider.AB1218,5,2118(b) Any cost-sharing amount imposed on an enrollee for the item or service is 19calculated as if the total amount that would have been charged for the item or 20service if provided by a participating provider is equal to the recognized amount for 21such item or service, plan or coverage, and year.AB1218,5,2322(c) No later than 30 days after the provider transmits the bill for services, the 23plan shall send to the provider an initial payment or a notice of denial of payment.AB1218,6,41(d) The plan shall make a total payment directly to the provider who provided 2the item or service to the enrollee that, added to any initial payment described 3under par. (c), is equal to the amount by which the out-of-network rate for the item 4or service exceeds the cost-sharing amount.AB1218,6,85(e) The plan counts any cost-sharing payment made by the enrollee for the 6item or service toward any in-network deductible or out-of-pocket maximum 7applied by the plan in the same manner as if the cost-sharing payment was made 8for the item or service when provided by a participating provider.AB1218,6,149(4) Charging for services by nonparticipating provider; notice and 10consent. (a) Except as provided in par. (c), a provider of an item or service who is 11entitled to payment under sub. (3) may not bill or hold liable an enrollee for any 12amount for the item or service that is more than the cost-sharing amount 13calculated under sub. (3) (b) for the item or service unless the nonparticipating 14provider provides notice and obtains consent in accordance with all of the following:AB1218,6,17151. The notice states that the provider is not a participating provider in the 16enrollee’s defined network plan, preferred provider plan, or self-insured 17governmental plan.AB1218,6,21182. The notice provides a good faith estimate of the amount that the 19nonparticipating provider may charge the enrollee for the item or service involved, 20including notification that the estimate does not constitute a contract with respect 21to the charges estimated for the item or service.AB1218,7,2223. The notice includes a list of the participating providers at the participating 1facility who would be able to provide the item or service and notification that the 2enrollee may be referred to one of those participating providers.AB1218,7,534. The notice includes information about whether or not prior authorization or 4other care management limitations may be required before receiving an item or 5service at the participating facility.AB1218,7,765. The notice clearly states that consent is optional and that the patient may 7elect to seek care from an in-network provider.AB1218,7,886. The notice is worded in plain language.AB1218,7,1097. The notice is available in languages other than English. The commissioner 10shall identify languages for which the notice should be available.AB1218,7,15118. The enrollee provides consent to the nonparticipating provider to be treated 12by the nonparticipating provider, and the consent acknowledges that the enrollee 13has been informed that the charge paid by the enrollee may not meet a limitation 14that the enrollee’s defined network plan, preferred provider plan, or self-insured 15governmental plan places on cost sharing, such as an in-network deductible.AB1218,7,17169. A signed copy of the consent described under subd. 8. is provided to the 17enrollee. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1218 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1218 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1218 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1218 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1218: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting